Utah statutes.
78A-6-110.    Venue -- Transfer or certification to other districts --
Dismissal without adjudication on merits.
(1)  Proceedings in minor's cases shall be commenced in the court of the
district in which the minor is living or is found, or in which an alleged
violation of law or ordinance occurred.
(2)  After the filing of a petition, the court may transfer the case to the
district where the minor resides or to the district where the violation of law
or ordinance is alleged to have occurred.  The court may, in its discretion,
after adjudication certify the case for disposition to the court of the
district in which the minor resides.
(3)  The transferring or certifying court shall transmit all documents and
legal and social records, or certified copies to the receiving court, and the
receiving court shall proceed with the case as if the petition had been
originally filed or the adjudication had been originally made in that court.
(4)  The dismissal of a petition in one district where the dismissal is
without prejudice and where there has been no adjudication upon the merits
shall not preclude refiling within the same district or another district where
there is venue of the case.
